Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 3.012, as amended by section 1, chapter 57, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended
to read:
3.012. (1) The judicial districts, the counties constituting the judicial districts and  the number
of circuit court judges for each judicial district are as follows:
(a) The first judicial district consists of Jackson County and has 11 judges.
(b) The second judicial district consists of Lane County and has [ 15] 17 judges.
(c) The third judicial district consists of Marion County and has 15 judges.
(d) The fourth judicial district consists of Multnomah County and has 38 judges.
(e) The fifth judicial district consists of Clackamas County and has [ 11] 13 judges.
(f) The sixth judicial district  consists of the counties of Morrow and Umatilla and has five
judges.
(g) The seventh judicial district consists of the counties  of Gilliam, Hood River, Sherman, Wasco
and Wheeler and has four judges.
(h) The eighth judicial district consists of Baker County and has one judge.
(i) The ninth judicial district consists of Malheur County and has two judges.
(j) The tenth judicial district consists of the counties of Union and Wallowa and has  two judges.
(k) The eleventh judicial district consists of Deschutes County and has nine judges.
(L) The twelfth judicial district consists of Polk County and has three judges.
(m) The thirteenth judicial district consists of Klamath County and has five judges.
(n) The fourteenth judicial district consists of Josephine County and has five judges.
(o) The fifteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Coos and Curry and has six  judges.
(p) The sixteenth judicial district consists of Douglas County and has [ five] six judges.
(q) The seventeenth judicial district consists of Lincoln County and has three judges.
(r) The eighteenth judicial district consists of Clatsop County and has three judges.
(s) The nineteenth judicial district consists of Columbia County and has three judges.
(t) The twentieth judicial district consists of Washington County and has 16 judges.
(u) The twenty-first judicial district consists of Benton County and has three judges.
(v) The twenty-second judicial district  consists of the counties of Crook and Jefferson and has
three judges.
Enrolled Senate Bill 95 (SB 95-A) Page 1
(w) The twenty-third judicial district consists of Linn County and has five judges.
(x) The twenty-fourth judicial district consists of  the counties of Grant and Harney and has one
judge.
(y) The twenty-fifth judicial district consists of Yamhill County and has four judges.
(z) The twenty-sixth judicial district consists of Lake County and has one judge.
(aa) The twenty-seventh judicial district consists of Tillamook County and has two judges.
(2) The Secretary of State shall designate position numbers equal to  the number of judges in
each of the judicial  districts established by this section. The positions shall reflect any qualifications
established by ORS 3.041.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 3.012,  as amended by sections 1 and 2, chapter 57, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
3.012. (1) The judicial districts, the counties constituting the judicial districts and  the number
of circuit court judges for each judicial district are as follows:
(a) The first judicial district consists of Jackson County and has 11 judges.
(b) The second judicial district consists of Lane County and has [ 15] 17 judges.
(c) The third judicial district consists of Marion County and has 15 judges.
(d) The fourth judicial district consists of Multnomah County and has 38 judges.
(e) The fifth judicial district consists of Clackamas County and has [ 12] 13 judges.
(f) The sixth judicial district  consists of the counties of Morrow and Umatilla and has five
judges.
(g) The seventh judicial district consists of the counties  of Gilliam, Hood River, Sherman, Wasco
and Wheeler and has four judges.
(h) The eighth judicial district consists of Baker County and has one judge.
(i) The ninth judicial district consists of Malheur County and has two judges.
(j) The tenth judicial district consists of the counties of Union and Wallowa and has  two judges.
(k) The eleventh judicial district consists of Deschutes County and has nine judges.
(L) The twelfth judicial district consists of Polk County and has three judges.
(m) The thirteenth judicial district consists of Klamath County and has five judges.
(n) The fourteenth judicial district consists of Josephine County and has five judges.
(o) The fifteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Coos and Curry and has six  judges.
(p) The sixteenth judicial district consists of Douglas County and has [ five] six judges.
(q) The seventeenth judicial district consists of Lincoln County and has three judges.
(r) The eighteenth judicial district consists of Clatsop County and has three judges.
(s) The nineteenth judicial district consists of Columbia County and has three judges.
(t) The twentieth judicial district consists of Washington County and has 16 judges.
(u) The twenty-first judicial district consists of Benton County and has three judges.
(v) The twenty-second judicial district  consists of the counties of Crook and Jefferson and has
three judges.
(w) The twenty-third judicial district consists of Linn County and has five judges.
(x) The twenty-fourth judicial district consists of  the counties of Grant and Harney and has one
judge.
(y) The twenty-fifth judicial district consists of Yamhill County and has four judges.
(z) The twenty-sixth judicial district consists of Lake County and has one judge.
(aa) The twenty-seventh judicial district consists of Tillamook County and has two judges.
(2) The Secretary of State shall  designate position numbers equal to the number of judges in
each of the judicial  districts established by this section. The positions shall reflect any qualifications
established by ORS 3.041.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for judicial compensation, is in-
creased by $1,835,445, for implementation of the amendments to ORS 3.012 by sections 1 and
2 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 95 (SB 95-A) Page 2
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1), chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, for judicial compensation, is in-
creased by $166,256, for implementation of the amendments to ORS 3.012 by sections  1 and
2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2025 Act  does not become operative unless House Bill 2712
becomes law.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial  Department by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled
House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for operations, is increased by
$3,595,975, for implementation of the amendments to ORS 3.012 by  sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 3.012 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Governor and  the Judicial Department may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to enable the Governor and
the department to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Governor and the depart-
ment by the amendments to ORS 3.012 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 95 (SB 95-A) Page 3